North Carolina statutes. Chapter 54. Cooperative Organizations.
Article 22. Merger, Consolidation and Other Fundamental Changes.

§ 54-159.
Procedure for merger.

Any two or more domestic associations organized under this Subchapter, either with or without capital stock, may merge into any one of such associations pursuant to a plan of merger approved in the manner provided in this Article.

The board of directors of each association shall, by resolution adopted by each such board, approve a plan of merger setting forth:

The names of the association proposing to merge, and the name of the association into which they propose to merge, which is hereinafter designated as the surviving association.

The name which the surviving association is to have, which name may be that of any of the associations involved in the merger or any other available name, subject, however, to the limitations of

G.S. 54-139

and 55A-10.

The terms and conditions of the proposed merger.

A statement of any changes in the charter of the surviving association to be effected by such merger.

Such other provisions not inconsistent with law as are deemed necessary or desirable.

History.

1963, c. 1168, s. 13.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Boiling Down Boilerplate in M Agreements: A Response to Choi, Gulati, & Scott,” see 67 Duke L.J. Online 219 (2019).

§ 54-160.
Procedure for consolidation.

Any two or more domestic associations organized under this Subchapter, either with or without capital stock, may consolidate into a new association pursuant to a plan of consolidation approved in the manner provided in this Article.

The board of directors of each association shall, by resolution adopted by each such board, approve a plan of consolidation setting forth:

The names of the associations proposing to consolidate, and the name of the new association into which they proposed to consolidate, which is hereinafter designated as the new association. The name of the new association may be that of any of the associations involved in the consolidation or any other available name, subject, however, to the limitations of

G.S. 54-139

and 55A-10.

The terms and conditions of the proposed consolidation.

With respect to the new association, all of the appropriate statements required to be set forth in articles of incorporation for associations organized under this Subchapter.

Such other provisions not inconsistent with law as are deemed necessary or desirable.

History.

1963, c. 1168, s. 13.

§ 54-161.
Approval of merger or consolidation; abandonment.

A plan of merger or consolidation shall be adopted in the following manner: The board of directors of each merging or consolidating association shall adopt a resolution approving the proposed plan, and directing that it be submitted to a vote at a meeting of members having voting rights, which may be either an annual or a special meeting. Written or printed notice of the meeting shall be given to each member entitled to vote at such meeting. The notice shall state that the proposed plan of merger or consolidation will be considered and acted upon at the meeting, and a copy or a summary of the plan of merger or plan of consolidation, as the case may be, shall be included in or enclosed with such notice. Such notice shall contain a statement, displayed with reasonable prominence, to the effect that objecting members are entitled, upon compliance with

G.S. 54-166

, including the 20-day demand requirement, to be paid the fair market value of their stock or other property rights or interest in the association, but failure of the notice to contain such a statement shall not invalidate the merger or consolidation. Each such notice shall be mailed by first-class mail at such a time that not less than 10 full days shall elapse between the date of mailing the notice and the date of the meeting, and shall be mailed to the member at his last address as it appears on the records of the association. The proposed plan shall be adopted upon receiving at least two-thirds of the votes entitled to be cast by members present at each such meeting where a quorum is present.

After such approval, and at any time prior to the filing of the articles of merger or consolidation, the merger or consolidation may be abandoned pursuant to provisions therefor, if any, set forth in the plan of merger or consolidation.

History.

1963, c. 1168, s. 13.

§ 54-162.
Articles of merger or consolidation.

Upon such approval, articles of merger or articles of consolidation shall be executed by each association and filed as provided in

G.S. 55A-4

, except that a copy thereof certified by the Secretary of State shall also be recorded in the office of the register of deeds of each county wherein the constituent associations have their principal places of business or their registered offices.

The articles of merger or consolidation shall set forth:

The plan of merger or the plan of consolidation; and

A statement setting forth the date of the meeting of the members of each association at which the plan was adopted, that a quorum was present at such meeting, and that such plan received at least two-thirds of the votes entitled to be cast by members present at each such meeting where a quorum was present.

The time when the merger or consolidation is effected is determined by the provisions of

G.S. 55A-4

.

History.

1963, c. 1168, s. 13; 1967, c. 823, s. 15.

§ 54-163.
Effect of merger or consolidation.

When such merger or consolidation has been effected:

The several associations, parties to the plan of merger or consolidation, shall be a single association which, in the case of a merger, shall be that association designated in the plan of merger as the surviving association, and, in the case of a consolidation, shall be the new association provided for in the plan of consolidation.

The separate existence of all associations which are parties to the plan of merger or consolidation, except the surviving or new association, shall cease.

Such surviving or new association shall have all the rights, privileges, immunities, and powers and shall be subject to all the duties and liabilities of an association organized under this Subchapter.

Such surviving or new association shall thereupon and thereafter, to the extent consistent with its charter as established or changed by the merger or consolidation, possess all the rights, privileges, immunities, and franchises, as well of a public as of a private nature, of each of the merging or consolidating associations; and all property, real and personal, and all debts due on any account, and all other choses in action, and all and every other interest, of or belonging to or due to each of the associations so merged or consolidated, shall be taken and deemed to be transferred to and vested in such single association without further act or deed; and the title to any real estate, or any interest therein, vested in any of such associations shall not revert or be in any way impaired by reason of such merger or consolidation.

Such surviving or new association shall thenceforth be responsible and liable for all the liabilities, contracts or other obligations, and penalties of each of the associations so merged or consolidated; and any claim existing or action or proceeding, civil or criminal, pending by or against any of such associations may be prosecuted as if such merger or consolidation had not taken place, or such surviving or new association may be substituted in its place; and any judgments rendered against any of the merged or consolidated associations may be enforced against the surviving or new association. Neither the rights of creditors nor any liens upon the property of any merged or consolidated association shall be impaired by such merger or consolidation.

In the case of a merger, the charter of the surviving association shall be deemed to be amended to the extent, if any, that changes in its charter are stated in the plan of merger. In the case of a consolidation, the articles of consolidation shall be deemed to be the articles of incorporation of the new association.

History.

1963, c. 1168, s. 13.

§ 54-164.
Merger or consolidation of domestic and foreign associations.

One or more domestic associations organized under this Subchapter and one or more foreign corporations engaging in any activity such as is described in

G.S. 54-132

, and which is a nonprofit cooperative in the sense that the term “nonprofit” is used in

G.S. 54-130

, may be merged or consolidated into an association of this State or an association or corporation of another state if such merger or consolidation is permitted by the laws of the state under which each such foreign association or corporation is organized.

Each domestic association shall comply with the provisions of this Article with respect to the merger or consolidation, as the case may be, of domestic associations, and each foreign association or corporation shall comply with the applicable provisions of the laws of the state under which it is organized.

If the surviving or new association or corporation, as the case may be, is an association or corporation of any state other than this State, it shall comply with the provisions of this Subchapter with respect to foreign corporations if it is to transact business in this State; and if after the merger or consolidation it transacts no business in this State, the courts of this State shall have jurisdiction in actions to enforce any obligation of any constituent association of this State and process therein may be served as provided in G.S. 55-145.

The effect of such merger or consolidation shall be the same as in the case of the merger or consolidation of domestic associations, if the surviving or new corporation is to be an association of this State. If the surviving or new association or corporation is to be an association or corporation of any state other than this State, the effect of such merger or consolidation shall be the same as in the case of the merger or consolidation of domestic associations except insofar as the laws of such other state provide otherwise.

If the new or surviving association or corporation is not an association of this State, then notwithstanding anything in the foregoing provisions of this section:

The rights of any member of any constituent association that is an association of this State to receive notice of objectors’ rights, to file his objection, upon such objection to demand and receive payment of the fair market value of his stock or other property rights or interests in the association, or to avail himself of any equitable relief to which he would be entitled if the surviving or new association or corporation were an association of this State, shall not be impaired; and

The courts of this State shall have jurisdiction in actions to enforce the aforesaid rights against the surviving or new association or corporation regardless of whether or not said association or corporation is otherwise subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of this State and in any such action service of process may be made in the manner provided in G.S. 55-145 that would be applicable if said association or corporation were transacting business in this State.

History.

1963, c. 1168, s. 13.

§ 54-165.
Sale, lease or exchange of assets; mortgage or pledge of assets.

A sale, lease, or exchange of all, or substantially all, the property and assets of an association organized under the provisions of this Subchapter may be made upon such terms and conditions and for such consideration, which may consist in whole or in part of money or property, real or personal, including shares of any corporation for profit, domestic or foreign, as may be authorized in the following manner: The board of directors shall adopt a resolution recommending such sale, lease, or exchange and directing that it be submitted to a vote at a meeting of members, which may be either an annual or a special meeting. Written or printed notice of the meeting shall be given to each member entitled to vote at such meeting. The notice shall state that the proposed sale, lease, or exchange will be considered and acted upon at such meeting, and a statement of the terms of the proposed sale, lease, or exchange, as the case may be, shall be included in or enclosed with such notice. Each such notice shall be mailed by first-class mail at such a time that not less than 10 full days shall elapse between the date of mailing the notice and the date of the meeting, and shall be mailed to the member at his last address as it appears on the records of the association. The proposed sale, lease, or exchange, as the case may be, shall be adopted upon receiving at least two-thirds of the votes entitled to be cast by members present at the meeting, if a quorum is present.

A mortgage or pledge of, or any other security interest in, all or any part or parts of the property of the association may be made by authority of the board of directors of the association without authorization of the members, unless otherwise provided in the charter or bylaws adopted by the members.

History.

1963, c. 1168, s. 13.

§ 54-166.
Rights of objecting members.

Any member of an association effecting a merger or consolidation may give to the association prior to or at the meeting of the members to which the proposal of merger or consolidation is submitted to a vote, written notice that he objects to such proposal. Within 20 days after the date on which the vote was taken, such member may, unless he votes in favor of the proposal, make written demand on the association for payment of the fair market value of his stock or other property rights or interest in the association. Such demand shall state the number and class of shares of stock owned by him or the nature and amount of other property rights or interest owned by him in the association. In addition to any other right he may have in law or equity, a member giving such notice shall be entitled, if and when the merger or consolidation is effected, to be paid by the surviving or new association, the fair market value of such stock, or other property rights or interests, as of the day prior to the date on which the vote was taken, subject only to the surrender by him of the certificate or certificates or other evidence of ownership of such stock or other property rights or interests.

If within 30 days after the date upon which the objecting member becomes entitled to payment for such stock or other property rights or interest, the fair market value of such stock or other property rights or interests is agreed upon between the member and the surviving or new association, as the case may be, payment therefor shall be made within 60 days after the agreement, upon surrender of the certificate or other evidence of such property rights or interests, whereupon the member shall cease to have any interest in such stock or other property rights or interests in the association.

If within the 30-day period mentioned in subsection (b) of this section the member and the association do not agree as to the fair market value of the stock or other property rights or interests, the member may, within 60 days after the expiration of the 30-day period, file a petition in the superior court of the county in which the association has its registered office or principal place of business asking for the appointment by the clerk of the superior court of that county of three qualified and disinterested appraisers to appraise the fair market value of the stock or other property rights or interests. A summons as in other cases of special proceedings, together with a copy of the petition, shall be served on the association at least 10 days prior to the hearing of the petition by the court. The award of the appraisers, or a majority of them, if no exceptions are filed thereto within 10 days after the award is filed in court, shall be confirmed by the court, and when confirmed shall be final and conclusive. The member, upon depositing with the court the proper stock certificates or other evidence of property rights or interests, shall be entitled to judgment against the association for the appraised value thereof as of the day prior to the date on which the vote was taken, together with interest thereon to the date of the confirmation. If either party files exceptions to the award within 10 days after the award is filed in court, the case shall be transferred to the civil issue docket of the superior court for trial during term and shall be there tried in the same manner, as near as may be practicable, as is provided in Chapter 40A of the General Statutes for the trial of cases under the eminent domain law of this State, and with the same right of appeal to the appellate division as is permitted in that Chapter. The court shall assess the cost of the proceedings as it shall deem equitable. Upon payment of the judgment, the owner of the stock or other property rights or interests shall cease to have any interest in the association and the association shall be entitled to have the stock certificates or other evidence of the property rights or interests surrendered to the association by the clerk of court. Unless the member files a petition within the time herein prescribed, the member and all persons claiming under the member shall have no right of payment hereunder, but in that event nothing herein shall impair the member’s status as a member.

If in the notices sent to members in connection with the meeting to vote upon a proposed merger or consolidation no reference is made as required by this Article to the provisions of this section, any member entitled to but who did not avail himself of the provisions of this section, unless he voted for the proposal, is entitled, if he so demands in writing within one year after the effective date of the merger or consolidation, to recover from the surviving or new association, as the case may be, any damage which he suffered from failure of the association of which he was a member to make the aforesaid reference.

The liability to pay for shares or to pay damages imposed by this section on an association extends to the successor association which acquires the assets of the predecessor, whether by merger or consolidation.

Shares of stock acquired by an association pursuant to payment of the agreed fair market value thereof or to payment of the judgment entered therefor as in this section provided, may be held and disposed of by the association as in the case of other treasury shares.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to a merger if on the date of the filing of the articles of merger the surviving association is the owner of all the outstanding shares of the other association, domestic or foreign, participating in the merger and if such merger makes no changes in the relative rights of the members of the surviving association.

Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions of this section, no member of an association effecting a merger or consolidation, who objects thereto and makes written demand for payment of the fair market value of his stock or other property rights or interests in the association, as hereinbefore provided in this section, shall be entitled to such payment at any time prior to the time that he would otherwise be entitled to payment pursuant to valid provisions of such stock, or valid provisions of the charter or the bylaws of the association, in effect on the date of the vote for such merger or consolidation. However, in any case where the owner of such stock or other property rights or interests in the association is not entitled, because of valid provisions of his stock, or because of valid provisions of the charter or bylaws of the association, to payment at the time hereinbefore provided in this section, the fair market value of such stock or other property rights or interests in the association, as of the day prior to the date on which the vote was taken, may be determined in any manner hereinbefore provided in this section, and the amount so determined, without interest, shall be an obligation of the surviving or new association, as the case may be, and shall be due and payable at the time that the owner thereof would be entitled to payment pursuant to valid provisions of such stock, or valid provisions of the charter or the bylaws of the association.

History.

1963, c. 1168, s. 13; 1973, c. 108, s. 19; 2001-487, s. 38(c).